Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2019 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 421.
SECTION 2. (1) The Department of  Corrections may enter into a contract with an inmate
telephone services provider in which the  provider provides inmate telephone services or
other inmate communications systems at the provider’s cost and reimburses the  depart-
ment:
(a) For the department’s internal and external costs to oversee and manage the inmate
telephone services or communications system; and
(b) To pay third party providers.
(2) The department may not enter into  a contract with an inmate telephone services
provider that authorizes the department  to receive a fee or commission for telephone ser-
vices provided to inmates other than the  reimbursement described in subsection (1) of this
section.
SECTION 3.
Sections 4, 5 and 6  of this 2019 Act are added to and made a part of ORS
169.005 to 169.677.
SECTION 4. (1) An inmate telephone service  provider may not provide a fee or commis-
sion to  a local or regional correctional facility, city or county for the provision of inmate
telephone services  other than a fee of five cents per minute or less, or other amount au-
thorized by the Public Utility Commission by rule, for completed interstate, intrastate or
international calls.
(2) The per-minute rate limits described in section  5 of this 2019 Act apply to the fee
described in subsection (1) of this section.
(3) Any fee or commission received by  a local or regional correctional facility, city or
county under subsection (1) of this section must be deposited in  the Inmate Welfare Fund
Account, established under section 6 of this 2019 Act, of the city or  county receiving the fee
or commission, or of the city or county in which the correctional facility  receiving the fee
or commission is located.
(4)(a) A local or regional correctional facility, city or county that receives  a fee or com-
mission described in subsection (1) of this section shall prepare a quarterly report with the
following information:
(A) A monthly accounting of the total revenue received from the  inmate telephone ser-
vice provider;
Enrolled Senate Bill 498 (SB 498-A) Page 1
(B) The total per-minute fees received;
(C) The share of revenue received by the correctional facility, city or county; and
(D) A detailed list of  expenditures during the previous quarter from the Inmate Welfare
Fund Account established under section 6 of this 2019 Act.
(b) The correctional facility, city or county  shall make the report described in paragraph
(a) of this subsection available to the public and shall place a link to the  report on the
website of the correctional facility, city or county.
(5) The Public Utility Commission may adopt rules  to carry out the provisions of this
section, including rules that authorize fees in  an amount other than that described in sub-
section (1) of this section.
(6) As used in this section, “regional correctional facility” has the meaning given  that
term in ORS 169.620.
SECTION 5.
(1) A local or regional correctional facility, city or county that issues a re-
quest for proposals to procure inmate telephone services shall:
(a) Consider call quality as a primary consideration when evaluating proposals; and
(b) Weight call quality at not less than 35 percent of the total weight that  the
correctional facility, city or county gives to all factors in the final evaluation of a proposal.
(2) A contract  between a local or regional correctional facility, city or county and an
inmate telephone service provider must include a  requirement that the provider submit a
monthly report to the correctional  facility, city or county containing the following informa-
tion for the previous month:
(a) All revenue earned;
(b) Any fees charged;
(c) Any moneys paid to the correctional facility, city or county;
(d) The number of completed calls;
(e) The number of dropped calls; and
(f) The number of complaints concerning call quality.
(3) A contract between a local or regional correctional facility, city or county  and an
inmate telephone service  provider must comply with the following per-minute rate limits
except as otherwise authorized by the Public Utility Commission by rule:
(a) For local or regional correctional facilities with less than 350 beds:
(A) $0.21 per minute for prepaid intrastate and interstate calls.
(B) $0.25 per minute for collect intrastate and interstate calls.
(C) $0.50 per minute for international calls to Mexico or Canada.
(D) $0.67 per minute for all other international calls.
(b) For facilities with at least 350 beds but less than 1,000 beds:
(A) $0.19 per minute for prepaid intrastate and interstate calls.
(B) $0.23 per minute for collect intrastate and interstate calls.
(C) $0.50 per minute for international calls to Mexico or Canada.
(D) $0.67 per minute for all other international calls.
(c) For facilities with at least 1,000 beds:
(A) $0.17 per minute for prepaid intrastate and interstate calls.
(B) $0.21 per minute for collect intrastate and interstate calls.
(C) $0.50 per minute for international calls to Mexico or Canada.
(D) $0.67 per minute for all other international calls.
(4) A contract between a local or regional correctional facility, city or county  and an
inmate telephone service provider may not authorize the collection of any fee other than the
following:
(a) The fees described in section 4 (1) of this 2019 Act.
(b) For  a paper copy of a billing statement requested by a customer, a $2.00 fee per
statement or other fee authorized by the commission by rule.
Enrolled Senate Bill 498 (SB 498-A) Page 2
(c) For electronic deposits of less than $25.00, a  deposit fee of $1.50 or other fee author-
ized by the commission by rule.
(d) For electronic deposits of $25.00 or  more, a deposit fee of $3.00 or other fee authorized
by the commission by rule.
(e) For deposits facilitated by a live operator, a deposit fee of $5.95 or  other fee author-
ized by the commission by rule.
(5) Nothing in this section prohibits a  contract from authorizing or collecting taxes or
other fees required by law.
(6) The Public Utility Commission may adopt rules  to carry out the provisions of this
section, including rules that authorize per-minute rates  and fees other than the rates and
fees described in this section.
(7) As used in this section, “regional correctional facility” has the meaning given  that
term in ORS 169.620.
SECTION 6. (1) A city or county that maintains  a local or regional correctional facility
shall establish an Inmate Welfare Fund  Account, separate and distinct from the general fund
of the city or county. All moneys in the account may be expended only for inmate  welfare
and may not be used for regular inmate meals, inmate clothing, inmate medical  care, facility
maintenance or staff salaries, staff clothing or staff equipment.
(2) As used in this section:
(a) “Inmate welfare”  means items or programs that enhance the lives of inmates, in-
cluding but not limited to education programs, job training programs, drug  and alcohol
treatment programs, exercise equipment,  televisions, cable subscriptions, electronic law li-
brary access, magazine  subscriptions, books, board games, microwaves available for inmate
use and meals or other foods provided for special events.
(b) “Regional correctional facility” has the meaning given that term in ORS 169.620.
SECTION 7.
Sections 2, 4, 5 and 6 of this 2019 Act apply to contracts for inmate telephone
services entered into, extended or renegotiated  on or after the effective date of this 2019 Act.
SECTION 8. This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2019 Act takes effect
July 1, 2019.
Enrolled Senate Bill 498 (SB 498-A) Page 3
Passed by Senate April 23, 2019
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House June 3, 2019
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Bev Clarno, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 498 (SB 498-A) Page 4